Idaho statutes. Title 50 MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS
Chapter 2 GENERAL PROVISIONS — GOVERNMENT — TERRITORY
§ 50-230. Separation of agricultural lands — Judgment of separation.

If, upon the hearing, the court shall find that such tract or tracts of land are tracts containing at least five (5) acres and are included within the corporate limits of such city and the lands included within such tract or tracts are used exclusively for agricultural purposes, provided, however, if there is upon or over such tract or tracts of land a railroad or canal right of way, such tract or tracts shall, if no other reason exists, be deemed to be used exclusively for agricultural purposes, within the meaning of this section; that such lands do not receive sufficient special benefits to justify the retention of said lands within the corporate limits of such city, and that by the detachment of said lands the symmetry of the city would not be materially marred, then the judge of said court shall grant the prayer of said petition and shall enter judgment and decree accordingly: Provided, however, that if said petition prays for detaching several tracts of land the court may enter judgment granting the prayer of the petition as to such tract or tracts as come within his findings as aforesaid and deny such petition as to such tract or tracts which do not come within his findings as aforesaid.

And said tract or tracts of land sought to be detached and for which the said judgment is entered detaching the same shall, upon the entering of said judgment, become detached from such city and the corporate boundary line or limits of said city shall be deemed changed accordingly, and said tract or tracts so detached shall be free from the government of such corporation from said date.

It shall not be necessary for the judge of the court, prior to entering his judgment, or at any time, to make written findings of fact or conclusions of law. Within twenty (20) days after the filing of said decree the petitioner shall file or cause to be filed with the county recorder and with the city clerk a certified copy thereof.

§ 50-231. Separation of agricultural lands — Liability for bonded indebtedness.

Such separation shall not relieve any such tract of land from its liability on account of any outstanding bonded indebtedness of such city existing at the time of its separation therefrom.

§ 50-232. Separation of agricultural lands — Streets not affected by separation.

The detaching of any lands from the corporate limits of any city under the provisions of this chapter shall not affect or change the status of any public streets or highways as the same are laid out, constructed or dedicated at the time of such detachment, but any public streets or highways included within the territory detached shall cease to be a part of such city.

§ 50-233. Separation of agricultural lands — Appeal.

Any city or any person aggrieved by the judgment of the court entered as herein provided may appeal from such decision and judgment to the Supreme Court. The procedure of said appeal shall be the same as the procedure on appeal from final judgment in civil actions.

§ 50-234. Lease of mining property by city.

Except as otherwise provided by law, whenever it has been determined or appears probable that any property of a city has become valuable by reason of veins, lodes, or other deposits of mineral underlying said property, the corporate authority of any city, upon the affirmative vote of one half (1/2) plus one (1) of the members of the full council, shall have the power, by ordinance, to grant a lease in and to such minerals, with the right to mine for and extract the same, provided, that the surface of said property shall be in no wise interfered with or disturbed. Such lease shall provide for such royalties and shall contain such other terms and provisions as said council may deem proper, but in no case shall any such lease be made for a greater period than twenty-five (25) years.

§ 50-235. Tax levy for general and special purposes.

The city council of each city is hereby empowered to levy taxes for general revenue purposes not to exceed nine tenths percent (.9%) of the market value for assessment purposes on all taxable property within the limits of the city in any one (1) year, and such levies for special purposes as are or may hereafter be provided, on all property within the limits of the city, taxable according to the laws of the state of Idaho, the valuation of such properties to be ascertained from the assessment rolls of the proper county.

§ 50-236. Capital improvement fund levy — Limitations.

Cities are hereby empowered to establish a “Capital Improvements Fund”, by ordinance, and levy a special tax not to exceed in the aggregate four-hundredths per cent (.04%) of market value for assessment purposes in any one (1) year. Said fund shall never exceed in the aggregate four-tenths per cent (.4%) of the market value for assessment purposes of the city. Such funds shall not be subject to the provisions of section 50-1014, Idaho Code. Said ordinance shall identify the specific purpose for which the capital improvements fund shall be used.

§ 50-237. Borrow money.

All cities may borrow money and pledge the credit, revenue and public property of the corporation for the payment thereof, in the manner provided by law, and to evidence the same by issuance of bonds, notes or warrants.